Utah statutes.
17-36-43.1.   Financial administration ordinance -- Purposes.

(1)  This section does not apply to a county of the first class.

(2)  The county legislative body, after consultation with the county auditor, may adopt a financial administration ordinance authorizing the county auditor, or appointed administrator in the case of county operated hospitals or mental health districts to act as the financial officer for the purpose of approving:

(a)  payroll checks, if the checks are prepared in accordance with a salary schedule established in a personnel ordinance or resolution; or

(b)  routine expenditures, such as utility bills, payroll-related expenses, supplies, materials, and payments on county-approved contracts and capital expenditures, which are referenced in the budget document and approved by an appropriation resolution adopted for the current fiscal year.



Enacted by Chapter 17, 2012 General Session

